Hawaii statutes.
[§502-125] Relation to federal Electronic
Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act. This part modifies,
limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National
Commerce Act, 15 United States Code section 7001, et seq., but does not modify,
limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that Act, or authorize electronic
delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that Act. [L
2009, c 102, pt of §2(1)]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next